Wisconsin, session 2025, SB222.
do enact as follows:SB222,11Section 1. 48.685 (1) (c) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,3,2248.685 (1) (c) 2. A violation of s. 940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.12, 940.19 3(2), (4), (5), or (6), 940.198 (2), 940.22 (2) or (3), 940.225 (1), (2), or (3), 940.285 (2), 4940.29, 940.295, 942.09 (2), 942.095, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) or (5) (a) 11., 2., 3., or 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.08, 948.081, 948.085, 2948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21, 948.215, 948.30, or 948.53.SB222,23Section 2. 48.686 (1) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,3,5448.686 (1) (c) 1. A violation of s. 940.12, 940.22 (2) or (3), 940.285 (2), 940.29, 5940.295, or 942.09 (2), or 942.095.SB222,36Section 3. 51.20 (13) (ct) 1m. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,3,15751.20 (13) (ct) 1m. a. Except as provided in subd. 2m., if the subject individual 8is before the court on a petition filed under a court order under s. 938.30 (5) (c) 1. 9and is found to have committed any violation, or to have solicited, conspired, or 10attempted to commit any violation, of ch. 940, 944, or 948 or s. 942.08 or, 942.09, or 11942.095, or ss. 943.01 to 943.15, the court may require the subject individual to 12comply with the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 if the court determines 13that the underlying conduct was sexually motivated, as defined in s. 980.01 (5), and 14that it would be in the interest of public protection to have the subject individual 15report under s. 301.45.SB222,416Section 4. 51.20 (13) (ct) 1m. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,3,241751.20 (13) (ct) 1m. b. If a court under subd. 1m. a. orders a person to comply 18with the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 in connection with the commission 19of a violation, or the solicitation, conspiracy, or attempt to commit a violation, of s. 20942.09 or 942.095, the court may provide that the person be released from the 21requirement to comply with the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 upon 22satisfying conditions specified by the court. If the person satisfies the conditions, 23the court shall notify the department of corrections that the person has satisfied 24the conditions.SB222,51Section 5. 62.50 (1e) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB222,4,2262.50 (1e) (cm) Section 942.095.SB222,63Section 6. 115.31 (2g) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,4,54115.31 (2g) (c) 1. A violation of s. 942.08, 942.09 (2), 942.095, 948.098, 948.10, 5or 948.11 (2) (a).SB222,76Section 7. 115.31 (2r) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,4,87115.31 (2r) (c) 3. A conviction for a violation of s. 942.09 (2) or 942.095 if the 8person depicted in the representation is a child.SB222,89Section 8. 301.45 (1p) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,4,2410301.45 (1p) (b) If a person is covered under sub. (1g) based solely on an order 11that was entered under s. 51.20 (13) (ct) 1m., 938.34 (15m) (am), 938.345 (3) (a), 12971.17 (1m) (b) 1m., or 973.048 (1m) in connection with a violation, or the 13solicitation, conspiracy, or attempt to commit a violation, of s. 942.09 or 942.095, 14and the court provided in the order that the person be released from the 15requirement to comply with the reporting requirements under this section upon 16satisfying the conditions of the court order under s. 51.20 (13) (ct) 1m. or the 17dispositional order under subch. VI of ch. 938, upon the termination or expiration of 18a commitment order under s. 971.17, or upon successful completion of the sentence 19or probation as provided under s. 973.048 (1m) (b), whichever is applicable, and the 20person satisfies the conditions of the court order under s. 51.20 (13) (ct) 1m. or the 21dispositional order under subch. VI of ch. 938, the commitment order under s. 22971.17 is terminated or expires, or the person successfully completes the sentence 23or probation, whichever is applicable, the person is no longer required to comply 24with the reporting requirements under this section.SB222,91Section 9. 901.08 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,5,52901.08 (1) (b) “Sexual misconduct” includes a violation of s. 940.22 (2), 3940.225 (1), (2), or (3), 940.32, 942.08, 942.09, 942.095, 948.02, 948.025, 948.05 (1) 4or (1m), 948.055 (1), 948.06, 948.07, 948.075, 948.08, 948.081, 948.09, 948.095, 5948.10, or 948.11 (2) and includes sexual harassment, as defined in s. 111.32 (13).SB222,106Section 10. 938.34 (15m) (am) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,5,147938.34 (15m) (am) 1. Except as provided in par. (bm), if the juvenile is 8adjudicated delinquent on the basis of any violation, or the solicitation, conspiracy, 9or attempt to commit any violation, under ch. 940, 944, or 948 or s. 942.08 or, 10942.09, or 942.095, or ss. 943.01 to 943.15, the court may require the juvenile to 11comply with the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 if the court determines 12that the underlying conduct was sexually motivated, as defined in s. 980.01 (5), and 13that it would be in the interest of public protection to have the juvenile report under 14s. 301.45.SB222,1115Section 11. 938.34 (15m) (am) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,5,2316938.34 (15m) (am) 2. If the court under subd. 1. orders the juvenile to comply 17with the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 in connection with a violation, or 18the solicitation, conspiracy, or attempt to commit a violation, of s. 942.09 or 942.095, 19the court may provide that the juvenile be released from the requirement to comply 20with the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 upon satisfying the conditions of 21the dispositional order imposed for the offense. If the juvenile satisfies the 22conditions of the dispositional order, the court shall notify the department of 23corrections that the juvenile has satisfied the conditions of the dispositional order.SB222,1224Section 12. 938.345 (3) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,6,91938.345 (3) (d) If the court under par. (a) orders the juvenile to comply with 2the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 in connection with a violation, or the 3solicitation, conspiracy, or attempt to commit a violation, of s. 942.09 or 942.095, the 4court may provide that the juvenile be released from the requirement to comply 5with the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 upon satisfying the conditions of 6the dispositional order imposed for the offense. If the juvenile satisfies the 7conditions of the dispositional order, the clerk of the court shall notify the 8department of corrections and the department of children and families that the 9juvenile has satisfied the conditions of the dispositional order.SB222,1310Section 13. 940.03 of the statutes is amended to read:SB222,6,1611940.03 Felony murder. Whoever causes the death of another human being 12while committing or attempting to commit a crime specified in s. 940.19, 940.195, 13940.20, 940.201, 940.203, 940.204, 940.225 (1) or (2) (a), 940.30, 940.31, 942.095, 14943.02, 943.10 (2), 943.231 (1), 943.30, 943.31, or 943.32 (2) may be imprisoned for 15not more than 15 years in excess of the maximum term of imprisonment provided 16by law for that crime or attempt.SB222,1417Section 14. 942.095 of the statutes is created to read:SB222,6,1818942.095 Sexual extortion. (1) In this section:SB222,6,1919(a) “Intimate representation” has the meaning given in s. 942.09 (1) (ag).SB222,6,2020(b) “Sexual conduct” has the meaning given in s. 944.21 (2) (e).SB222,6,2221(2) Except as provided in sub. (3), whoever does any of the following is guilty 22of a Class I felony:SB222,7,223(a) Threatens to injure the property or reputation of another person with the 1intent to coerce that person to engage in sexual conduct or to produce an intimate 2representation of that person.SB222,7,53(b) Threatens to commit violence against another person with the intent to 4coerce that person to engage in sexual conduct or to produce an intimate 5representation of that person.SB222,7,106(c) Threatens to distribute an intimate representation of another person with 7the intent to coerce that person to engage in sexual conduct, to produce another 8intimate representation of that person, to provide the payment of money, property, 9services, or any other thing of value to the actor, or to do or refrain from doing any 10act against that person’s will.SB222,7,1211(3) Whoever violates sub. (2) is guilty of a Class H felony if any of the following 12applies:SB222,7,1313(a) The victim, as a result of the violation, engages in sexual conduct.SB222,7,1514(b) The victim, as a result of the violation, produces an intimate 15representation.SB222,7,1716(c) The victim, as a result of the violation, provides the payment of money, 17property, services, or any other thing of value to the actor.SB222,7,1818(d) The victim, as a result of the violation, suffers great bodily harm. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb222 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb222 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB222 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB222 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB222: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting